es: Tipo de asa de bolso de tela: Doble; Largo; Corto; Otros
it: Tipo di manico della sporta: Doppie; Lungo; Corta; Altro
sk-SK: Typ rukoväte: Dvojitý; Dlhý; Krátky; Iné
da: Taskehåndtagstype: Dobbelt; Lang; Kort; Andet
hu: Bevásárlótáska fogantyújának típusa: Kettős; Hosszú; Rövid; Egyéb
en: Tote handle type: Dual; Long; Short; Other
cs: Typ rukojeti tašky: Duální; Dlouhé; Krátký; Jiné
el: Τύπος λαβής τσάντας tote: Διπλός; Μακρύ; Κοντό; Άλλο
fi: Kassin kahvatyyppi: Kaksiosainen; Pitkä; Lyhyt; Muu
pl: Typ uchwytu torby: Dual; Długie; Krótkie; Inne
nl: Type draagtas: Dubbel; Lang; Kort; Andere
vi: Loại tay cầm túi: Hai nhiệt độ; Dài; Ngắn; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de alça da sacola: Dual; Longo; Curto; Outro
zh-CN: 装运箱手柄类型: 双温区; 长; 短; 其他
tr: Tote sapı türü: Çift; Uzun; Kısa; Diğer
de: Tragegrifftyp: Zwei; Lang; Kurz; Sonstiges
fr: Type de poignée de compartiment: Double; Long; Courte; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta ročaja torbice: Dvojni; Dolga; Kratka; Drugo
th: ประเภทหูหิ้วกระเป๋าทรงถุง: คู่; ยาว; สั้น; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de pega de bolsa: Duplo; Comprido; Curto; Outro
lt-LT: Krepšio stiliaus rankinės rankenos tipas: Dviguba; Ilga; Trumpa; Kita
ro-RO: Tip mâner geantă tote: Dublu; Lung; Scurt; Altele
ja: トートバッグの持ち手部分の種類: デュアル; ロング; ショート; その他
sv: Typ av bärhandtag: Dubbel; Lång; Kort; Övrigt
zh-TW: 貨箱手柄類型: 雙重; 長; 短; 其他
ru: Тип ручки сумки тоут: Двойной; Длинный; Короткий; Другой
ko: 토트 핸들 유형: 듀얼; 롱; 짧은; 기타
bg-BG: Тип дръжка за чанта тип „тоут“: Двойна; Дълга; Къса; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta ručke torbe: Dvostruka; Duga; Kratka; Ostalo
nb: Håndtakstype for bæreveske: Dobbel; Lang; Kort; Annet